Utah statutes.
78B-10a-103.   Punitive damages.

A claim for punitive damages may not be made in an arbitration proceeding in accordance with this chapter or any subsequent proceeding, even if the claim is later resolved through a trial de novo in accordance with Section 78B-10a-108.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 2011 General Session

